Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5918.
people of the state of michigan enact: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 CHAPTER XVII Sec. 11b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 28 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 28.214(6)(b) Pub trst F Unauthorized disclosure of information from LEIN ï¿½ subsequent offense 4 28.293(1) Pub ord E False information when applying for state ID 5 28.293(2) Pub ord D False information when applying for state ID ï¿½ second offense 7 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 28.293(3) Pub ord C False information when applying for state ID ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 15 28.295(1)(a) Pub ord D Counterfeiting or forging state ID card or using counterfeited or forged state ID card to commit felony punishable by imprisonment for 10 years or more 10 28.295(1)(b) Pub ord E Counterfeiting or forging state ID card or using counterfeited or forged state ID card to commit felony punishable by imprisonment for less than 10 years or a misdemeanor punishable by more than 6 months 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 28.295(2) Pub ord E Selling counterfeited or forged state ID card or possessing counterfeited or forged state ID card with intent to deliver to another person or possessing 2 or more counterfeited or forged state ID cards 5 28.295(5) Property H Using stolen state ID card to commit felony Variable 28.295a(1) Pub ord H False representation to obtain or misuse personal information 4 28.295a(2) Pub ord G False representation to obtain or misuse personal information ï¿½ second offense 7 28.295a(3) Pub ord C False representation to obtain or misuse personal information ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28.308 Pub saf E False certification or statement in application for enhanced driver license or enhanced official state personal identification card 5 28.422(14) Pub saf F Forgery on firearm license application 4 28.422a(5) Pub saf F False statement on firearm sales record 4 28.425b(3) Pub saf F False statement on concealed pistol permit application 4 28.425j(3) Pub saf F Unlawful granting or presenting of pistol training certificate 4 28.425o(6)(c) Pub saf F Carrying concealed pistol or electro-muscular disruption device in prohibited place ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 4 28.429(4) Pub saf E Failure to store a firearm resulting in injury 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 28.429(5) Pub saf D Failure to store a firearm resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 28.429(6) Pub saf C Failure to store a firearm resulting in death 15 28.435(14)(c) Pub saf G Firearm sale without trigger lock, gun case, or storage container ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 2 28.468(1)(c) Pub saf E Michigan fireworks safety act violation causing serious impairment 5 28.468(1)(d) Pub saf C Michigan fireworks safety act violation causing death 15 28.516(2) Pub saf F False statement on concealed firearm certificate application 4 28.674 Pub saf F False report of a public threat 4 28.729(1)(a) Pub ord F Failure to register as a sex offender, first offense 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 28.729(1)(b) Pub ord D Failure to register as a sex offender, second offense 7Life 28.729(1)(c) Pub ord D Failure to register as a sex offender, third or subsequent offense 10Life 28.729(2) Pub ord F Failure to update sex offender registration information 2 28.754(1) Pub ord F False report of a child abduction 4 Sec. 12e. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in sections 601 to 624b of chapter VI of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, within chapter 257 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 257.601b(3) Person C Moving violation causing death to another person in a work zone or a school bus zone 15Life 257.601c(2) Person C Moving violation causing death to operator of implement of husbandry 15 257.602a(2) Pub saf G Fourth degree fleeing and eluding 2Life 257.602a(3) Pub saf E Third degree fleeing and eluding 5Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 257.602a(4) Person D Second degree fleeing and eluding 10Life 257.602a(5) Person C First degree fleeing and eluding 15 257.616a(2)(b) Pub saf G Using a signal preemption device 2 257.616a(2)(c) Pub saf E Using a signal preemption device causing a traffic accident 5 257.616a(2)(d) Person D Using a signal preemption device causing serious impairment of a body function 10 257.616a(2)(e) Person C Using a signal preemption device causing death 15 257.616a(2)(f) Pub ord G Selling or purchasing a signal preemption device 2 257.617(2) Person E Failure to stop at scene of accident resulting in serious impairment or death 5 257.617(3) Person C Failure to stop at scene of accident resulting in death when at fault 15Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 Sec. 12f. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in sections 625 to 625q of chapter VI of the Michigan vehicle code, 1949 PA 300, within chapter 257 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 257.625(4)(a) Person C Operating a vehicle while intoxicated or impaired or with the presence of a controlled substance causing death 15Life 257.625(4)(b) Person B Operating a vehicle with alcohol content of 0.17 grams or more with prior conviction and causing death 20Life 257.625(4)(c) Person B Operating a vehicle while intoxicated or impaired or with the presence of a controlled substance causing death to certain persons 20Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 257.625(5)(a) Person E Operating a vehicle while intoxicated or impaired or with the presence of a controlled substance causing serious impairment 5Life 257.625(5)(b) Person D Operating a vehicle with alcohol content of 0.17 grams or more with prior conviction and causing serious impairment 10 257.625(7)(a)(ii) Person E Operating a vehicle while intoxicated or impaired or with the presence of a controlled substance with a minor in the vehicle ï¿½ subsequent offense 5 257.625(9)(c) Pub saf E Operating a vehicle while intoxicated or with the presence of a controlled substance ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 257.625(10)(b) Person E Allowing a vehicle to be operated while intoxicated or impaired causing death 5 257.625(10)(c) Person G Allowing a vehicle to be operated while intoxicated or impaired causing serious impairment 2 257.625(11)(c) Pub saf E Operating a vehicle while impaired ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 5 257.625m(5) Pub saf E Commercial drunk driving ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 5 257.625q(3) Pub saf D Knowingly providing false information concerning an ignition interlock device 10 257.625q(5) Pub saf D Failure to report illegal ignition interlock device 10 Sec. 13m. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 333 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7340 CS F Sale, distribution, or delivery of product containing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine by mail, internet, or telephone 4 333.7340c(2) CS D Soliciting another person to purchase or obtain ephedrine or pseudoephedrine to manufacture methamphetamine 10Life 333.7341(8) CS G Delivery or manufacture of imitation controlled substance 2 333.7401(2)(a)(i) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances Life 333.7401(2)(a)(ii) CS A Delivery or manufacture of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.7401(2)(a)(iii) CS B Delivery or manufacture of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20Life 333.7401(2)(a)(iv) CS D Delivery or manufacture of less than 50 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20Life 333.7401(2)(b)(i) CS B Delivery or manufacture of methamphetamine or 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine 20Life 333.7401(2)(b)(ii) CS E Delivery or manufacture of certain schedule 1, 2, or 3 controlled substances 7Life 333.7401(2)(c) CS F Delivery or manufacture of schedule 4 controlled substance 4Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7401(2)(d)(i) CS C Delivery or manufacture of 45 or more kilograms of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 15Life 333.7401(2)(d)(ii) CS D Delivery or manufacture of 5 or more but less than 45 kilograms of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 7Life 333.7401(2)(d)(iii) CS F Delivery or manufacture of less than 5 kilograms or 20 plants of marihuana or synthetic equivalents of marihuana 4Life 333.7401(2)(e) CS G Delivery or manufacture of schedule 5 controlled substance 2 333.7401(2)(f) CS D Delivery or manufacture of a prescription form or counterfeit prescription form 7Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7401a Person B Delivering a controlled substance or GBL with intent to commit criminal sexual conduct 20 333.7401b(3)(a) CS E Delivery or manufacture of GBL 7 333.7401b(3)(b) CS G Possession of GBL 2 333.7401c(2)(a) CS D Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory 10Life 333.7401c(2)(b) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory in presence of minor 20Life 333.7401c(2)(c) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving hazardous waste 20Life 333.7401c(2)(d) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory near certain places 20Life 333.7401c(2)(e) CS A Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving firearm or other harmful device 25 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.7401c(2)(f) CS B Operating or maintaining controlled substance laboratory involving methamphetamine 20Life 333.7402(2)(a) CS D Delivery or manufacture of certain counterfeit controlled substances 10Life 333.7402(2)(b) CS E Delivery or manufacture of schedule 1, 2, or 3 counterfeit controlled substance 5 333.7402(2)(c) CS F Delivery or manufacture of counterfeit schedule 4 controlled substance 4 333.7402(2)(d) CS G Delivery or manufacture of counterfeit schedule 5 controlled substance 2 333.7402(2)(e) CS C Delivery or manufacture of controlled substance analogue 15Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7403(2)(a)(i) CS A Possession of 1,000 or more grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances Life 333.7403(2)(a)(ii) CS A Possession of 450 or more but less than 1,000 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 30Life 333.7403(2)(a)(iii) CS B Possession of 50 or more but less than 450 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 20Life 333.7403(2)(a)(iv) CS G Possession of 25 or more but less than 50 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 4Life 333.7403(2)(a)(v) CS G Possession of less than 25 grams of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substances 4Life 333.7403(2)(b)(i) CS D Possession of methamphetamine or 3, 4-methylenedioxymethamphetamine 10Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.7403(2)(b)(ii) CS G Possession of certain schedule 1, 2, 3, or 4 controlled substances or controlled substances analogue 2Life 333.7403a CS F Fraudulently obtaining controlled substance or prescription for controlled substance 4 333.7404(2)(a) CS G Use of certain schedule 1 or 2 controlled substance Life 333.7405(1)(a) CS G Controlled substance violations by licensee 2 333.7405(1)(b) CS G Manufacturing or distribution violations by licensee 2 333.7405(1)(c) CS G Refusing lawful inspection 2 333.7405(1)(d) CS G Maintaining drug house 2Life 333.7405(1)(e) CS G Unlawfully dispensing out-of-state prescription 2 333.7407(1)(a) CS G Controlled substance violations by licensee 4 333.7407(1)(b) CS G Use of fictitious, revoked, or suspended license number 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 333.7407(1)(c) CS G Obtaining controlled substance by fraud 4 333.7407(1)(d) CS G False reports under controlled substance article 4 333.7407(1)(e) CS G Possession of counterfeiting implements 4 333.7407(1)(f) CS F Disclosing or obtaining prescription information 4 333.7407(1)(g) CS F Possession of counterfeit prescription form 4 333.7407(2) CS G Refusing to furnish records under controlled substance article 4 333.7410(2) CS E Delivery of certain controlled substances within 1,000 feet of school or library by individual 18 years of age or older Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 333.7410(3) CS E Possession with intent to deliver controlled substance within 1,000 feet of school or library by individual 18 years of age or older Life 333.7410a CS G Controlled substance offense or offense involving GBL in or near a park 2 333.7417 CS F Sell or offer to sell named product producing same or similar effect as scheduled ingredient 4 Sec. 13n. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 333 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 333.10116(1) Pub ord E Purchasing or selling body part of deceased individual for transplantation or therapy 5 333.10117 Pub ord E Falsifying, concealing, or defacing document of anatomical gift for financial gain 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 333.10204(1) Pub ord F Transferring a human organ for valuable consideration 4 333.10204(4) Pub saf F Removal of a human organ by an unauthorized individual 4 333.10205 Pub saf F Removal of a human organ in an unapproved facility 4 333.13738(2) Pub saf F Waste disposal violations ï¿½ subsequent offense 5 333.13738(3) Pub saf F Improper disposal of waste with indifference to human life 2 Pub saf B Improper disposal of waste with extreme indifference to human life 20 333.16170(3) Pub trst F False representation of completion of health professional recovery program 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 333.16213a(3) Pub trst G Medical record ï¿½ intentional omission of certain medical services ï¿½ health professional 2 333.16279(5)(a) Person G Performing certain medical treatment on a minor ï¿½ first offense 2 333.16279(5)(b) Person E Performing certain medical treatment on a minor ï¿½ subsequent offense 5 333.16294 Pub saf F Unauthorized practice of health profession 4 333.17748d(2) Person G Compounding pharmacy violation 2 333.17748d(3) Person F Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in personal injury 4 333.17748d(4) Person E Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in serious impairment of a body function 5 333.17748d(5) Person C Compounding pharmacy violation resulting in death 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 333.17764(3) Pub saf G Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device 2 333.17764(4) Pub saf F Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in personal injury 4 333.17764(5) Pub saf E Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in serious impairment of a body function 5 333.17764(6) Pub saf C Adulterating, misbranding, removing, or substituting a drug or device resulting in death 15 333.17766c(2)(b) CS G Possessing more than 12 grams ephedrine or pseudoephedrine 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 333.17766c(2)(c) CS E Purchasing or possessing ephedrine or pseudoephedrine knowing or having reason to know that it is to be used to manufacture methamphetamine 5Life 333.20142(5) Pub trst F False statement in application for licensure as health facility 4 333.20153 Pub saf D Reuse of single-use medical device 10 333.20175b(3) Pub trst G Medical record ï¿½ intentional omission of certain medical services ï¿½ health facility or agency 2 333.21792 Pub trst G Nursing home accepting referral fees, bribing officials, or accepting bribes 4 333.26424(l) Pub trst G Selling marihuana in violation of registry identification card restrictions 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 333.27407a(c) Pub saf F Operating medical marihuana facility without a license resulting in death or serious injury 4 Sec. 14a. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 400 to 407 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 400.60(1) Property H Welfare ï¿½ obtaining benefits to which individual is not entitled 4 400.60(2) Property H Welfare ï¿½ obtaining over $500 by failure to inform 4 400.293 Pub trst E Charitable organizations and solicitations act violations 5 400.603 Pub trst G Medicaid fraud ï¿½ false statement in benefit/concealing information 4 400.604 Pub trst G Medicaid fraud ï¿½ kickback/referral fees 4 400.605 Pub trst G Medicaid fraud ï¿½ false statement regarding institutions 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 400.606 Property E Medicaid fraud ï¿½ conspiracy 10 400.607 Pub trst G Medicaid fraud ï¿½ false claim/medically unnecessary 4 400.609 Property D Medicaid fraud ï¿½ fourth or subsequent offense 10 400.713(13) Pub saf H Adult foster care ï¿½ unlicensed facility 2 Pub saf F Adult foster care ï¿½ unlicensed facility ï¿½ subsequent violation 5 400.722(4) Pub saf F Adult foster care ï¿½ maintaining operation after refusal of licensure 5 Sec. 14h. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 445 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 445.33(2)(b) Pub ord E Mail theft ï¿½ second or subsequent offense 5 445.65 Pub ord E Identity theft 5Life Pub ord D Identity theft ï¿½ second offense 10Life Pub ord C Identify theft ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 15Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 445.67 Pub ord E Solicit, obtain, possess, sell, or transfer personal identifying information of another or falsify a police report with intent to commit identity theft 5Life Pub ord D Obtain, possess, sell, or transfer personal identifying information of another or falsify a police report with intent to commit identity theft ï¿½ second offense 10Life Pub ord C Obtain, possess, sell, or transfer personal identifying information of another or falsify a police report with intent to commit identity theft ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 15Life 445.408(2) Pub ord E Buying or selling stolen scrap metal 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 445.408(3) Pub ord E Buying or selling stolen scrap metal ï¿½ subsequent offense 5 445.433(2) Pub ord E Knowingly buying or selling stolen scrap metal or other specific items 5 445.487(2) Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer failure to record material matter ï¿½ subsequent offense 2 445.488(2) Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer violations ï¿½ subsequent offense 2 445.489 Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer failing to record transaction or falsifying transaction record, or making improper purchase 2 445.490 Pub ord H Precious metal and gem dealer failure to obtain a certificate of registration or retain precious item for required period 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 445.574(2)(c) Pub ord E Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $10,000.00 or more but less than $20,000.00 with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 5 445.574(2)(d) Pub ord C Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $20,000.00 or more but less than $50,000.00 with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 15 445.574(2)(e) Pub ord C Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $50,000.00 or more but less than $100,000.00 with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 445.574(2)(f) Pub ord B Failure to originate and maintain record of deposits on certain containers valued at $100,000.00 or more with intent to defraud or cheat, or repeat offense 20 445.574a(2)(d) Pub ord H Improper return of 10,000 or more nonrefundable containers 5 445.574a(3)(d) Pub ord H Improper acceptance or delivery of 10,000 or more nonrefundable containers by dealer 5 445.574a(4)(d) Pub ord H Improper acceptance or delivery of 10,000 or more nonrefundable containers by distributor 5 445.667 Pub ord G Changing, altering, or modifying reverse vending machine or data for reverse vending machine 2 445.779 Pub ord H Antitrust violation 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 445.1505 Pub trst G Fraudulent filing, offer, or sale of franchise 7 445.1508 Pub trst G Sale of franchise without proper disclosure 7 445.1513 Pub trst G Illegal offer or sale of franchise 7 445.1520 Pub trst G Failure to keep or maintain record of sale of franchise 7 445.1521 Pub trst G False representation of departmental finding, recommendation, or approval of franchise document 7 445.1523 Pub trst G False statement of material fact to department of attorney general regarding franchise 7 445.1525 Pub trst G False advertising of franchise 7 445.1671 Pub trst E False statement in report required by mortgage broker or lender 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 445.2081 Pub ord E Purchasing or selling stolen plastic bulk merchandise containers 5 445.2507(2) Pub ord F Violation of unsolicited commercial e-mail protection act in furtherance of crime 4 445.2583 Pub trst F Establish, promote, or operate a pyramid promotional scheme 7 Sec. 15d. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 600 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 600.908(8) Pub trst E Immunity to witness ï¿½ committing perjury 15 600.2136 Pub trst E Library record, book, paper ï¿½ false certification in court 15 600.2907a Property G Recording documents affecting property without lawful cause 3 600.2916 Pub saf G Revised judicature act ï¿½ lethal gases for fumigation 4 600.2950(23) Person G Failure to comply with personal protection order Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 600.8713 Pub trst G Revised judicature act ï¿½ false statement by authorized local officials 15 600.8813 Pub trst E Law enforcement officer ï¿½ knowingly making false statement in a citation 15 Sec. 16d. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.81(1) Person G Assault Life 750.81(2) Person G Domestic violence Life 750.81(3) Person G Assault of pregnant individual Life 750.81(4) Person G Domestic violence or assault of pregnant individual with a prior conviction Life 750.81(5) Person E Domestic assault or assault of a pregnant individual with prior convictions 5Life 750.81a(1) Person G Aggravated assault Life 750.81a(2) Person G Aggravated domestic violence Life 750.81a(3) Person E Aggravated domestic assault with prior convictions 5Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.81d(1) Person G Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons 2Life 750.81d(2) Person F Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons causing bodily injury requiring medical attention 4Life 750.81d(3) Person C Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons causing serious impairment 15Life 750.81d(4) Person B Assaulting, resisting, or obstructing certain persons causing death 20 750.81e(2) Person G Assault on utility worker causing bodily injury requiring medical attention 2 750.81e(3) Person E Assault on utility worker causing serious impairment of a body function 5 750.82(1) Person F Felonious assault 4Life 750.82(2) Person F Felonious assault ï¿½ weapon-free school zone 4 750.83 Person A Assault with intent to murder Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.84(1)(a) 750.84(1) Person D Assault with intent to do great bodily harm less than murder 10Life 750.84(1)(b) 750.84(2) Person D Assault by strangulation or suffocation 10Life 750.85 Person A Torture Life 750.86 Person D Assault with intent to maim 10Life 750.87 Person D Assault with intent to commit a felony 10Life 750.88 Person C Assault with intent to commit unarmed robbery 15Life 750.89 Person A Assault with intent to commit armed robbery Life 750.90(1) Person C Sexual contact under pretext of medical treatment 20 750.90(2) Person B Sexual penetration under pretext of medical treatment 25 750.90a Person A Assault against a pregnant individual causing miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus with intent or recklessness Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.90b(a) Person C Assault against a pregnant individual resulting in miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 15 750.90b(b) Person D Assault against a pregnant individual resulting in great bodily harm to embryo or fetus 10 750.90c(a) Person C Gross negligence against a pregnant individual resulting in miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 15 750.90c(b) Person E Gross negligence against a pregnant individual resulting in great bodily harm to embryo or fetus 5 750.90d(a) Person C Operating a vehicle under the influence or while impaired causing miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.90d(b) Person E Operating a vehicle under the influence or while impaired causing serious or aggravated injury to embryo or fetus 5 750.90e Person G Careless or reckless driving causing miscarriage, stillbirth, or death to embryo or fetus 2 750.90g(3) Person A Performance of procedure on live infant with intent to cause death Life 750.91 Person A Attempted murder Life Sec. 16f. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.110 Property D Breaking and entering with intent to commit felony or larceny 10 750.110a(2) Person B Home invasion ï¿½ first degree 20Life 750.110a(3) Person C Home invasion ï¿½ second degree 15Life 750.110a(4) Person E Home invasion ï¿½ third degree 5Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.111 Property E Entering without breaking with intent to commit felony or larceny 5Life 750.112 Person A Burglary with explosives Life 750.116(1) Property E Possession of burglar's tools with intent to steal money or property from a structure or depository other than a motor vehicle 10 750.116(2) Property E Possession of burglar's tools with intent to steal a motor vehicle 5 750.116(3) Property E Possession of burglar's tools as part of a criminal organization and with intent to steal more than 1 motor vehicle 10 750.117 Pub trst F Bribing a public officer 4 750.118 Pub trst D Public officer accepting bribe 10 750.119(1)(a) Pub trst F Bribing a juror or other person 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.119(1)(b) Pub trst D Bribing a juror or other person in case punishable by more than 10 years 10 750.120 Pub trst F Juror or other person accepting a bribe 4 750.120a(2)(a) Pub ord F Juror intimidation 4 750.120a(2)(b) Pub ord D Juror intimidation in case punishable by more than 10 years 10 750.120a(2)(c) Person C Juror intimidation by committing crime or threatening to kill or injure 15 750.120a(4) Person D Retaliating against juror 10 750.121 Pub trst F Bribing a public officer to influence contract 4 750.122(7)(a) Pub ord F Bribing or intimidating witness 4Life 750.122(7)(b) Pub ord D Bribing or intimidating witness in case punishable by more than 10 years 10Life 750.122(7)(c) Person C Intimidating witness by committing crime or threatening to kill or injure 15Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.122(8) Person D Retaliating against witness 10Life 750.124 Pub trst G Bribing an athlete 4 750.128 Pub ord H Bucket shop violation 2 750.131(3)(b)(ii) Property G NSF checks ï¿½ $100 to $500 ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 2 750.131(3)(c) Property G NSF checks ï¿½ $500 or more 2 750.131a(1) Property H No account checks 2 750.131a(2) Property H NSF checks, 3 or more within 10 days 2 Sec. 16g. (1) This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.135 Person D Exposing children with intent to injure or abandon 10 750.135a(2)(c) Person D Leaving child unattended in vehicle resulting in serious physical harm 10 750.135a(2)(d) Person B Leaving child unattended in vehicle resulting in death 15 750.136 Person B Female genital mutilation violation 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.136a Person B Transporting person for purpose of female genital mutilation 15 750.136b(2) Person A First degree child abuse Life 750.136b(4)(a) 750.136b(4) Person C Second degree child abuse ï¿½ first offense 10Life 750.136b(4)(b) Person B Second degree child abuse ï¿½ with prior conviction 20 750.136b(6)(a) 750.136b(6) Person G Third degree child abuse ï¿½ first offense 2Life 750.136b(6)(b) Person E Third degree child abuse ï¿½ with prior conviction 5 750.136b(8)(b) Person G Fourth degree child abuse ï¿½ with prior conviction 2 750.136c Person B Buying or selling an individual 20 750.136d(1)(a) Person A First degree child abuse in presence of another child Life 750.136d(1)(b) Person D Second degree child abuse in presence of another child ï¿½ first offense 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 750.136d(1)(c) Person B Second degree child abuse in presence of another child ï¿½ second or subsequent offense 20 750.136d(1)(d) Person G Third degree child abuse in presence of another child 2 750.145a Person F Soliciting child to commit an immoral act 4Life 750.145b Person D Accosting children for immoral purposes with prior conviction 10 750.145c(2)(a) Person B Producing child sexually abusive activity or material 20Life 750.145c(2)(b) Person B Aggravated producing of child sexually abusive activity or material 25Life 750.145c(3)(a) Person D Distributing, promoting, or financing the distribution of child sexually abusive activity or material 7Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.145c(3)(b) Person C Aggravated distributing, promoting, or financing the distribution of child sexually abusive activity or material 15Life 750.145c(4)(a) Person F Possessing child sexually abusive material 4Life 750.145c(4)(b) Person B Aggravated possession of child sexually abusive material 10Life 750.145d(2)(b) Variable G Using internet or computer to commit crime punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 1 year but less than 2 years 2 750.145d(2)(c) Variable F Using internet or computer to commit crime punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 2 years but less than 4 years 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.145d(2)(d) Variable D Using internet or computer to commit crime punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 4 years but less than 10 years 10 750.145d(2)(e) Variable C Using internet or computer to commit crime punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 10 years but less than 15 years 15 750.145d(2)(f) Variable B Using internet or computer to commit crime punishable by a maximum term of imprisonment of at least 15 years or for life 20 750.145h(3) Person G Causing vulnerable adult to provide sexually explicit visual material ï¿½ second or subsequent offense 2 750.145n(1) Person C First degree vulnerable adult abuse 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 750.145n(2) Person F Second degree vulnerable adult abuse 4 750.145n(3) Person G Third degree vulnerable adult abuse 2 750.145o Person E Death of vulnerable adult caused by unlicensed caretaker 5 750.145p(1) Person G Commingling funds of, obstructing investigation regarding, or filing false information regarding, vulnerable adult 2 750.145p(2) Person G Retaliation or discrimination by caregiver against vulnerable adult 2 750.145p(5) Person E Caregiver or licensee violation against vulnerable adult ï¿½ second or subsequent offense 5 750.147b(3)(a) Person G Certain hate-crime-related violations 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.147b(3)(b) Person E Certain hate-crime-related violations ï¿½ second or subsequent offense or aggravating factors 5 750.147b(3)(c) Person D Certain hate-crime-related violations ï¿½ second or subsequent offense or aggravating factors 10 750.147c(2) Property D Institutional desecration involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.147c(3) Property E Institutional desecration involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 (2) For a violation of section 145d of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.145d, determine the offense category, offense variable level, and prior record variable level based on the underlying offense. Sec. 16i. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.158 Pub ord E Sodomy 15 750.159j Pub saf B Racketeering 20Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.160 Pub ord D Disinterring or mutilating dead human body 10 750.160a Pub ord H Photographing dead human body 2 750.160c Pub ord D Improper disposal of dead human body after more than 180 days 10 750.160d(1) Person G Sexual contact committed with a dead human body 2 750.160d(2) Person C Sexual penetration committed with a dead human body 15 750.161 Pub ord G Desertion, abandonment, or nonsupport 3 750.164 Pub ord F Desertion to escape prosecution 4 750.165 Pub ord F Failing to pay support 4 750.168(2)(a) Pub ord G Disorderly conduct at a funeral, memorial service, viewing, procession, or burial 2 750.168(2)(b) Pub ord F Disorderly conduct at a funeral, memorial service, viewing, procession, or burial ï¿½ subsequent offense 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.174(4) Property E Embezzlement by agent of $1,000 to $20,000, or with prior convictions, or of $200 to $1,000 from nonprofit corporation or charitable organization 5Life 750.174(5) Property D Embezzlement by agent of $20,000 to $50,000, or with prior convictions, or of $1,000 to $20,000 from nonprofit corporation or charitable organization 10 750.174(6) Property C Embezzlement by agent of $50,000 to $100,000 15Life 750.174(7) Property B Embezzlement by agent of $100,000 or more 20Life 750.174a(4) Property E Embezzlement from vulnerable adult of $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.174a(5) Property D Embezzlement from vulnerable adult of $20,000 to $50,000 or with prior convictions 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.174a(6) Property C Embezzlement from vulnerable adult of $50,000 to $100,000 or with prior convictions 15Life 750.174a(7) Property B Embezzlement from vulnerable adult of $100,000 or more or with prior convictions 20 750.175 Pub trst D Embezzlement by public officer of more than $50 10 750.176 Pub trst E Embezzlement by administrator, executor, or guardian 10 750.177(2) Property D Embezzlement by chattel mortgagor of $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.177(3) Property E Embezzlement by chattel mortgagor of $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.178(2) Property D Embezzling mortgaged or leased property of $20,000 or with prior convictions 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.178(3) Property E Embezzling mortgaged or leased property of $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.180 Property D Embezzlement by financial institution 20 750.181(4) Property E Embezzling jointly held property with value of $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.181(5) Property D Embezzling jointly held property with value of $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.182 Property G Embezzlement by warehouses 4 750.182a Pub trst H Falsifying school records 2 Sec. 16j. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.183 Pub saf E Aiding escaping prisoner 7 750.186a(1) Pub saf F Escape from a juvenile facility 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.189 Pub saf H Officer negligently allowing prisoner to escape or refusing to receive prisoner 2 750.190 Pub saf G Officer receiving reward to assist or permit escape 2 750.193 Pub saf E Escape from prison 5Life 750.195(1) Pub saf H Escape from a misdemeanor jail sentence 2 750.195(2) Pub saf F Escape from a felony jail sentence 4Life 750.197(1) Pub saf H Escape while awaiting trial for misdemeanor 2 750.197(2) Pub saf F Escape while awaiting trial for felony 4 750.197c Pub saf E Escape from jail through violence 5Life 750.199(3) Pub saf F Harboring a person for whom felony warrant has been issued 4 750.199a Pub ord F Absconding on or forfeiting bond 4 Sec. 16k. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.200 Pub saf E Transporting an explosive by common carrier 5 750.200i(2)(a) Pub saf C Manufacturing or using a harmful device 15 750.200i(2)(b) Property B Harmful device causing property damage 20 750.200i(2)(c) Person A Harmful device causing personal injury 25 750.200i(2)(d) Person A Harmful device causing serious impairment Life 750.200j(2)(a) Person E Irritant or irritant device 5 750.200j(2)(b) Property E Irritant or irritant device causing property damage 7 750.200j(2)(c) Person D Irritant or irritant device causing personal injury 10 750.200j(2)(d) Person A Irritant or irritant device causing serious impairment 25 750.200j(2)(e) Person A Irritant or irritant device causing death Life 750.200(l) Person E Falsely exposing person to harmful substance or device 5 750.201 Pub saf E Transporting certain types of explosives 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.202 Pub saf F Shipping an explosive with false markings or invoice 4 750.204(2)(a) Pub saf C Sending an explosive with malicious intent 15 750.204(2)(b) Property B Sending an explosive causing property damage 20 750.204(2)(c) Person A Sending an explosive causing physical injury 25 750.204(2)(d) Person A Sending an explosive causing serious impairment Life 750.204a Pub saf E Sending or transporting an imitation explosive device with malicious intent 5 750.204b Pub saf G Importing, manufacturing, distributing, or storing explosives in violation of certain federal laws and regulations 2 750.207(2)(a) Pub saf C Placing an explosive with malicious intent 15Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.207(2)(b) Property B Placing an explosive causing property damage 20 750.207(2)(c) Person A Placing an explosive causing physical injury 25 750.207(2)(d) Person A Placing an explosive causing serious impairment Life 750.209(1)(a) Pub saf C Placing an offensive or injurious substance with intent to injure 15 750.209(1)(b) Property B Placing an offensive or injurious substance causing property damage 20 750.209(1)(c) Person A Placing an offensive or injurious substance causing physical injury 25 750.209(1)(d) Person A Placing an offensive or injurious substance causing serious impairment Life 750.209(2) Pub saf E Placing an offensive or injurious substance with intent to alarm or annoy 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 750.209a Pub saf D Possessing an explosive device in public place 10 750.210(2)(a) Pub saf C Possessing or carrying an explosive or combustible substance with malicious intent 15 750.210(2)(b) Property B Possessing or carrying an explosive or combustible substance causing property damage 20 750.210(2)(c) Person A Possessing or carrying an explosive or combustible substance causing physical injury 25 750.210(2)(d) Person A Possessing or carrying an explosive or combustible substance causing serious impairment Life 750.210a Pub saf H Sale of valerium 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 750.211a(2)(a) Pub saf F Manufacturing or possessing a Molotov cocktail or similar device designed to explode upon impact or by heat or flame or that is highly incendiary 4 750.211a(2)(b) Pub saf C Manufacturing or possessing an explosive or incendiary device with malicious intent 15 750.211a(2)(c) Property B Manufacturing or possessing an explosive or incendiary device causing property damage 20 750.211a(2)(d) Person A Manufacturing or possessing an explosive or incendiary device causing physical injury 25 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 750.211a(2)(e) Person A Manufacturing or possessing an explosive or incendiary device causing serious impairment Life 750.212a Person B Explosives violation involving a vulnerable target 20 Sec. 16l. (1) This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.213 Person B Threats to extort money 20Life 750.213a(3)(a) Person Variable Coercing female to have an abortion against her will Variable 750.213b(1)(a) Person E Extortion involving sexually explicit visual material ï¿½ first offense 5 750.213b(1)(b) Person D Extortion involving sexually explicit visual material ï¿½ second offense 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.213b(1)(c) Person B Extortion involving sexually explicit visual material ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 20 750.213b(2) Person B Extortion involving sexually explicit visual material ï¿½ certain aggravating factors 25 750.215(3) Pub saf F Impersonating peace officer 4 750.217b Pub saf G Impersonating public utility employee 2 750.217c(3) Pub ord H Impersonating public officer or employee ï¿½ subsequent conviction 2 750.217c(4) Pub ord G Impersonating public officer or employee ï¿½ third or subsequent conviction 4 750.217d Pub saf C False representation or practice as health professional 15 750.217e Pub ord G Impersonating a DHHS employee 2 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.217f Pub saf G Impersonating a firefighter or emergency medical service personnel 2 750.218(4) Property E False pretenses involving $1,000 or more but less than $20,000 or $200 or more but less than $1,000 with prior convictions 5Life 750.218(5) Property C False pretenses involving $20,000 or more but less than $50,000 or $1,000 or more but less than $20,000 with prior convictions 15Life 750.218(6) Property C False pretenses involving a value of $50,000 or more but less than $100,000 or $20,000 or more but less than $50,000 with prior convictions 15Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 750.218(7) Property B False pretenses involving a value of $100,000 or more or $50,000 or more but less than $100,000 with prior convictions 20Life 750.219a(2)(c) Property E Telecommunications fraud with 1 or more prior convictions or involving a value of $1,000 to $20,000 5 750.219a(2)(d) Property D Telecommunications fraud with 2 or more prior convictions or involving a value of $20,000 or more 10 750.219d(4)(a) Pub ord C Residential mortgage fraud violation involving loan value of $100,000 or less 15 750.219d(4)(b) Pub ord B Residential mortgage fraud violation involving loan value of more than $100,000 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.219e Property F Receiving, possessing, preparing, or submitting an unauthorized credit application or receiving or possessing proceeds 4 750.219f Property F Receiving with intent to forward, possessing with intent to forward, or forwarding an unauthorized credit application or proceeds 4 (2) For a violation of section 213a(3)(a) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.213a, determine the offense class, offense variable level, and prior record variable level based on the underlying offense. Sec. 16m. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.223(2) Pub saf F Sale of firearm to minor ï¿½ subsequent offense 4 750.223(3) Pub ord D Sale of firearm to person prohibited from possessing 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.224 Pub saf E Manufacture or sale of silencer, bomb, blackjack, automatic weapon, gas spray, etc. 5 750.224a(4) Pub saf F Possession or sale of electrical current weapons 4 750.224a(6) Pub saf G Improper use of electro-muscular disruption device 2 750.224b Pub saf E Possession of short barreled shotgun or rifle 5 750.224c Pub saf F Armor piercing ammunition 4 750.224d(2) Person G Using self-defense spray device 2 750.224e Pub saf F Manufacture/sale/possession of devices to convert semiautomatic weapons 4 750.224f(6) Pub saf E Possession or sale of firearm by prohibited person 5Life 750.224f(7) Pub saf E Possession or sale of ammunition by prohibited person 5Life 750.226 Pub saf E Carrying firearm or dangerous weapon with unlawful intent 5 750.227 Pub saf E Carrying a concealed weapon 5 750.227a Pub saf F Unlawful possession of pistol 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.227b(1) Pub saf D Felony firearm - first, second, third, or subsequent offense Life 750.227b(2) Pub saf D Felony firearm pneumatic gun - first, second, third, or subsequent offense Life 750.227c Pub saf G Possessing a loaded firearm in or upon a vehicle 2 750.227f Pub saf F Wearing body armor during commission of certain crimes 4 750.227g(1) Pub saf F Felon purchasing, owning, possessing, or using body armor 4 750.230 Pub saf G Altering ID mark on firearm 2 750.232a(3) Pub saf G False statement in a firearm application 4 750.234a(1)(a) Pub saf D Discharging firearm from vehicle 10 750.234a(1)(b) Person C Discharging firearm from vehicle causing physical injury 15 750.234a(1)(c) Person B Discharging firearm from vehicle causing serious impairment 20 750.234a(1)(d) Person A Discharging firearm from vehicle causing death Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.234b(1) Pub saf D Discharging firearm at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure 10 750.234b(2) Pub saf D Discharging firearm in a dwelling or potentially occupied structure 10 750.234b(3) Pub saf C Discharging firearm in or at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure causing physical injury 15 750.234b(4) Person B Discharging firearm in or at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure causing serious impairment 20 750.234b(5) Person A Discharging firearm in or at a dwelling or potentially occupied structure causing death Life 750.234c Pub saf F Discharging firearm at emergency/police vehicle 4 750.235b(2) Pub saf D Threatening to commit violent act against school students or employees on school property with an overt act toward completion or with specific intent 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.236 Person C Setting spring gun ï¿½ death resulting 15 750.237(3) Person E Using firearm while under the influence or impaired causing serious impairment 5 750.237(4) Person C Using firearm while under the influence or impaired causing death 15 Sec. 16p. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.317 Person M2 Second degree murder Life 750.317a Person A Delivery of controlled substance causing death Life 750.321 Person C Manslaughter 15Life 750.322 Person C Willful killing of unborn quick child 15 750.327 Person A Death by explosives on vehicle or vessel Life 750.328 Person A Death by explosives in or near building Life 750.329 Person C Homicide ï¿½ weapon aimed with intent but not malice 15 750.329a Person E Assisting a suicide 5 Sec. 16q. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.332 Property H Entering horse in race under false name 4 750.335a(2)(b) Person G Aggravated indecent exposure 2 750.335a(2)(c) Person A Indecent exposure by sexually delinquent person Life 750.338 Pub ord G Gross indecency between males 5 Pub ord A Gross indecency between males involving sexually delinquent person Life 750.338a Pub ord G Gross indecency between females 5 Pub ord A Gross indecency between females involving sexually delinquent person Life 750.338b Pub ord G Gross indecency between males and females 5 Pub ord A Gross indecency between males and females involving sexually delinquent person Life 750.349 Person A Kidnapping Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.349a Person A Prisoner taking a hostage Life 750.349b Person C Unlawful imprisonment 15Life 750.350 Person A Kidnapping ï¿½ child enticement Life 750.350a Person H Kidnapping ï¿½ custodial interference 1 Sec. 16r. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.356(2) Property D Larceny involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10Life 750.356(3) Property E Larceny involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5Life 750.356(4) Property G Larceny involving $200 to $1,000 with prior convictions Life 750.356a(1) Property G Larceny from a motor vehicle 5 750.356a(2)(c) Property E Breaking and entering a vehicle to steal $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5Life 750.356a(2)(d) Property D Breaking and entering a vehicle to steal $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.356a(3) Property G Breaking and entering a vehicle to steal causing damage 5Life 750.356b Property G Breaking and entering a coin telephone 4 750.356c Property E Retail fraud ï¿½ first degree 5Life 750.356d(1) Property G Retail fraud ï¿½ second degree Life 750.357 Person D Larceny from the person 10Life 750.357a Property G Larceny of livestock 4 750.357b Property E Larceny ï¿½ stealing firearms of another 5Life 750.358 Property G Larceny from burning building 5 750.360 Property G Larceny in a building 4Life 750.360a(2)(b) Property F Theft detection device offense with prior conviction 4 750.361 Property H Trains ï¿½ stealing/maliciously removing parts 2 750.362 Property E Larceny by conversion involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 Property D Larceny by conversion involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.362a(2) Property D Larceny of rental property involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.362a(3) Property E Larceny of rental property involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.363 Property E Larceny by false personation involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 Property D Larceny by false personation involving $20,000 or more 10 750.365 Person D Larceny from car or persons detained or injured by accident 20 750.367 Property E Larceny of trees or shrubs involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 Property D Larceny of a tree or shrub involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.367b Property E Airplanes ï¿½ taking possession 5 750.368(5) Pub ord G Preparing, serving, or executing unauthorized process ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 4 750.372 Pub ord H Running or allowing lottery 2 750.373 Pub ord H Selling or possessing lottery tickets 2 750.374 Pub ord H Lottery violations ï¿½ subsequent offense 4 Sec. 16s. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.377a(1)(a) Property D Malicious destruction of personal property involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10Life 750.377a(1)(b) Property E Malicious destruction of personal property involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.377b Property F Malicious destruction of fire/police property 4Life 750.377c Property E School bus ï¿½ intentional damage 5 750.378 Property F Malicious destruction of property ï¿½ dams/canals/mills 4 750.379 Property F Malicious destruction of property ï¿½ bridges/railroads/locks 4 750.380(2) Property D Malicious destruction of building involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10Life 750.380(3) Property E Malicious destruction of a building involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5Life 750.382(1)(c) Property E Malicious destruction of plants or turf involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.382(1)(d) Property D Malicious destruction of plants or turf involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.383a Property E Malicious destruction of utility equipment or utility infrastructure component 5Life 750.386 Property E Malicious destruction of mine property 20 750.387(5) Property E Malicious destruction of a tomb or memorial involving $1,000 to $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.387(6) Property D Malicious destruction of a tomb or memorial involving $20,000 or more or with prior convictions 10 750.392 Property E Malicious destruction of property ï¿½ vessels 10 750.394(2)(c) Person F Throwing or dropping dangerous object at vehicle causing injury 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.394(2)(d) Person D Throwing or dropping dangerous object at vehicle causing serious impairment 10 750.394(2)(e) Person C Throwing or dropping dangerous object at vehicle causing death 15 750.395(2)(c) Property E Damaging or destroying research property with a value between $1,000 and $20,000 or with prior convictions 5 750.395(2)(d) Property E Damaging or destroying research property with a value of $20,000 or more or 2 or more prior convictions 5 750.395(2)(e) Person E Damaging or destroying research property resulting in physical injury 5 750.395(2)(f) Person D Damaging or destroying research property resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 750.395(2)(g) Person C Damaging or destroying research property resulting in death 15 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.397 Person D Mayhem 10 750.397a Person D Placing harmful objects in food 10 750.405 Pub saf E Inciting soldiers to desert 5 750.406 Pub saf E Military stores ï¿½ larceny, embezzlement or destruction 5 Sec. 16t. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.409b Pub ord F Knowing possession of ransomware with intent to use without authorization 3 750.410a Person G Conspiracy to commit a person to state hospital unjustly 4 750.411a(1)(b) Pub ord F False report of a felony 4 750.411a(1)(c) Person E False report of crime resulting in physical injury 5 750.411a(1)(d) Person D False report of crime resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.411a(1)(e) Person C False report of crime resulting in death 15 750.411a(3)(a) Pub ord F Threat or false report of an explosive or harmful device, substance, or material 4 750.411a(3)(b) Pub ord D Threat or false report of an explosive or harmful device, substance, or material ï¿½ subsequent offense 10 750.411a(4)(b) Person E False report of medical or other emergency resulting in physical injury 5 750.411a(4)(c) Person D False report of medical or other emergency resulting in serious impairment of body function 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.411a(4)(d) Person C False report of medical or other emergency resulting in death 15 750.411b Pub trst G Excess fees to members of legislature 4 750.411h(2)(a) Person G Stalking Life 750.411h(2)(b) Person E Stalking of a minor 5Life 750.411i(3)(a)750.411i(3) Person ED Aggravated stalking 5Life 750.411i(3)(b) Person D Aggravated stalking of a minor 10 750.411l Pub ord H Fourth degree money laundering 2 750.411m Pub ord E Third degree money laundering 5 750.411n Pub ord D Second degree money laundering 10 750.411o Pub ord B First degree money laundering 20 750.411p(2)(a) Property B Money laundering of proceeds from controlled substance offense involving $10,000 or more 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.411p(2)(b) Property D Money laundering of proceeds from controlled substance offense or other proceeds involving $10,000 or more 10 750.411p(2)(c) Property E Money laundering ï¿½ transactions involving represented proceeds 5 750.411s(2)(a) Person G Unlawful posting of message 2 750.411s(2)(b) Person E Unlawful posting of message with aggravating circumstances 5 750.411t(2)(b) Person E Hazing resulting in serious impairment of body function 5 750.411t(2)(c) Person C Hazing resulting in death 15 750.411u Pub ord B Gang membership felonies 20Life 750.411v(1) Person E Gang recruitment 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.411v(2) Person B Retaliation for withdrawal from gang 20 750.411w Pub ord E Selling or possessing automated sales suppression device or zapper, phantom-ware, or skimming device 5 750.411x(4) Person E Cyberbullying causing serious injury 5 750.411x(5) Person D Cyberbullying causing death 10 Sec. 16w. (1) This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.451(3) Pub ord G Prostitution ï¿½ various offenses ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 2 750.451(4) Person E Soliciting a person under 18 years of age to commit prostitution 5Life 750.452 Pub ord E Keeping a house of prostitution 5 750.455 Pub ord B Pandering 20 750.456 Person B Placing spouse into prostitution 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 750.457 Pub ord B Accepting earnings of a prostitute 20 750.458 Person B Prostitution ï¿½ detaining person for debt 20 750.459(1) Person B Transporting a person for prostitution 20Life 750.459(2) Person E Selling travel services to facilitate prostitution or human trafficking in other jurisdictions 5 750.459(3) Person D Selling travel services to facilitate prostitution or human trafficking in other jurisdictions involving a minor 10 750.462f(1)(a) Person D Human trafficking violation 10 750.462f(1)(b) Person C Human trafficking violation resulting in bodily injury 15 750.462f(1)(c) Person B Human trafficking violation resulting in serious bodily injury 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.462f(1)(d) Person A Human trafficking violation involving death or the commission of certain felonies Life 750.462f(2) Person B Obtaining a minor for commercial sexual activity or for forced labor or services 20 750.462f(3) Person Variable Attempting, conspiring, or soliciting another to violate human trafficking laws Variable 750.465a(1)(b) Property G Operating audiovisual recording device in a theatrical facility ï¿½ second offense 2 750.465a(1)(c) Property F Operating audiovisual recording device in a theatrical facility ï¿½ third or subsequent offense 4 (2) For a violation of section 462f(3) of the Michigan penal code, 1931 PA 328, MCL 750.462f, determine the offense category, offense variable level, and prior record variable level based on the underlying offense. Sec. 16x. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.478a(2) Pub ord H Unauthorized process to obstruct a public officer or employee 2 750.478a(3) Pub ord G Unauthorized process to obstruct a public officer or employee ï¿½ subsequent offense 4 750.479(2) Person G Assaulting or obstructing certain officials 2Life 750.479(3) Person G Assaulting or obstructing certain officials causing injury 4 750.479(4) Person D Assaulting or obstructing certain officials causing serious impairment 10 750.479(5) Person B Assaulting or obstructing certain officials causing death 20 750.479a(2) Pub saf G Fleeing and eluding ï¿½ fourth degree 2Life 750.479a(3) Pub saf E Fleeing and eluding ï¿½ third degree 5Life 750.479a(4) Person C Fleeing and eluding ï¿½ second degree 10Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 750.479a(5) Person B Fleeing and eluding ï¿½ first degree 15 750.479b(1) Person F Disarming peace officer ï¿½ nonfirearm 4Life 750.479b(2) Person D Disarming peace officer ï¿½ firearm 10Life 750.479c(2)(c) Pub ord G Providing false information to peace officer conducting criminal investigation 2 750.479c(2)(d) Pub ord F Providing false or misleading information to peace officer conducting criminal investigation regarding certain felonies 4 750.480 Pub trst F Public officers ï¿½ refusing to turn over books/money to successor 4 750.483a(2)(b) Person D Withholding evidence, preventing report of crime, or retaliating for reporting crime punishable by more than 10 years 10 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.483a(4)(b) Person D Interfering with police investigation by committing crime or threatening to kill or injure 10 750.483a(6)(a) Pub ord F Tampering with evidence or offering false evidence 4 750.483a(6)(b) Pub ord D Tampering with evidence or offering false evidence in case punishable by more than 10 years 10Life 750.488 Pub trst H Public officers ï¿½ state official ï¿½ retaining fees 2 750.490 Pub trst H Public money ï¿½ safekeeping 2 750.491 Pub trst H Public records ï¿½ removal/mutilation/ destruction 2 750.492a(1)(a) Pub trst G Medical record ï¿½ intentional place false information ï¿½ health care provider 4 750.492a(2) Pub trst G Medical record ï¿½ health care provider ï¿½ altering to conceal injury/death 4 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.495a(2) Person F Concealing objects in trees or wood products ï¿½ causing injury 4 750.495a(3) Person C Concealing objects in trees or wood products ï¿½ causing death 15 750.498b(2)(a) Person E Tampering with, taking, or removing marine safety device without authority causing serious impairment 5 750.498b(2)(b) Person C Tampering with, taking, or removing marine safety device without authority causing death 15 750.502d Pub saf F Unlawfully possessing or transporting anhydrous ammonia or tampering with containers 4 750.505 Pub ord E Common law offenses 5 750.508(2)(b) Pub ord G Carrying or possessing a scanner in the commission of a crime 2 750.511 Person A Blocking or wrecking railroad track Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.512 Property E Uncoupling railroad cars 10 Sec. 16y. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.520b(2) Person A First degree criminal sexual conduct Life 750.520c 750.520c(2) Person C Second degree criminal sexual conduct 15Life 750.520d Person B Third degree criminal sexual conduct 15Life 750.520e Person G Fourth degree criminal sexual conduct 2Life 750.520g(1) Person D Assault with intent to commit sexual penetration 10Life 750.520g(2) Person E Assault with intent to commit sexual contact 5Life 750.520n Pub saf G Electronic monitoring device violation 2 750.528 Pub saf F Destroying dwelling house or other property during riot or unlawful assembly 4 750.528a Pub saf F Civil disorders ï¿½ firearms/explosives 4 750.529 Person A Armed robbery Life 750.529a Person A Carjacking Life 750.530 Person C Unarmed robbery 15Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 29 750.531 Person C Bank robbery/safebreaking Life 750.532 Person H Seduction 5 Sec. 16bb. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 750 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 750.543f Person A Terrorism without causing death Life 750.543h(3)(a) Pub ord B Hindering prosecution of terrorism ï¿½ certain terrorist acts 20 750.543h(3)(b) Pub ord A Hindering prosecution of terrorism ï¿½ act of terrorism Life 750.543k Pub saf B Soliciting or providing material support for terrorism or terrorist acts 20 750.543m Pub ord B Threat or false report of terrorism 20 750.543p Pub saf B Use of internet or telecommunications to commit certain terrorist acts 20 750.543r Pub saf B Possession of vulnerable target information with intent to commit certain terrorist acts 20 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 750.545 Pub ord E Misprision of treason 5 750.552b Property F Trespassing on correctional facility property 4 750.552c Pub saf F Trespass upon key facility 4 750.553 Property G Squatting , second or subsequent offense 2Life Sec. 17b. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapter 752 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 752.272a(2)(c) Pub saf F Sale or distribution of nitrous oxide device ï¿½ 2 or more prior convictions 4 752.365(3) Pub ord G Obscenity ï¿½ subsequent offense 2 752.541 Pub saf D Riot 10Life 752.542 Pub saf D Incitement to riot 10Life 752.542a Pub saf D Riot in state correctional facilities 10Life 752.543 Pub saf G Unlawful assembly 5 Sec. 17g. This chapter applies to the following felonies enumerated in chapters 800 to 830 of the Michigan Compiled Laws: M.C.L. Category Class Description Stat Max 800.281(1) Pub saf H Furnishing prisoner with contraband 5 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 21 22 23 24 25 26 27 28 800.281(2) Pub saf H Furnishing prisoner with contraband outside 5 800.281(3) Pub saf H Bringing contraband into prisons 5Life 800.281(4) Pub saf E Prisoner possessing contraband 5Life 800.283(1) Pub saf E Furnishing weapon to prisoner in prison 5 800.283(2) Pub saf E Prisons ï¿½ knowledge of a weapon in a correctional facility 5 800.283(3) Pub saf E Bringing weapon into prison 5Life 800.283(4) Pub saf E Prisoner possessing weapon 5Life 800.283a Pub saf E Furnishing cell phone to prisoner 5 801.262(1)(a) Pub saf E Bringing weapon into jail 5Life 801.262(1)(b) Pub saf E Furnishing weapon to prisoner in jail 5 801.262(2) 801.262(3) Pub saf E Prisoner in jail possessing weapon 5Life 801.262a 801.262a(2) Pub saf E Furnishing cell phone or other wireless device to prisoner in jail 5Life 1 2 3 4 5 6 7 8 9 10 11 12 13 14 15 16 17 18 19 20 801.263(1) Pub saf H Furnishing contraband to prisoner in jail 5Life 801.263(2) Pub saf H Prisoner in jail possessing contraband 5Life Enacting section 1. This amendatory act takes effect 90 days after the date it is enacted into law. Enacting section 2. This amendatory act does not take effect unless all of the following bills of the 103rd Legislature are enacted into law: (a) House Bill No. 5908 (request no. H01981'25). (b) House Bill No. 5912 (request no. H02093'25). (c) House Bill No. 5917 (request no. H02202'25). (d) House Bill No. 5913 (request no. H02203'25). (e) House Bill No. 5910 (request no. H02204'25). (f) House Bill No. 5915 (request no. H02205'25). (g) House Bill No. 5909 (request no. H02210'25). (h) House Bill No. 5914 (request no. H02295'25). (i) House Bill No. 5911 (request no. H02773'25). (j) House Bill No. 5916 (request no. H02774'25). (k) House Bill No. 5907 (request no. H02775'25).